Maryland, session 2025, SB0602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–419.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “PARENTALLY–PLACED PRIVATE SCHOOL
STUDENT” MEANS A CHILD WITH A DISABILITY ENROLLED BY THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN OF THE CHILD IN A PRIVATE ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL OR
FACILITY, INCLUDING A RELIGIOUS SCHOOL OR FACILITY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH 20
U.S.C. § 1412(A)(10)(A).
(2) “PARENTALLY–PLACED PRIVATE SCHOOL STUDENT” DOES NOT
INCLUDE A CHILD WITH A DISABILITY WHO WAS PLACED IN OR REFERRED TO A
PRIVATE SCHOOL OR FACILITY BY A PUBLIC AGENCY AS A MEANS OF PROVIDING
SPECIAL EDUCATION AND RELATED SERVICES UNDER § 8–406 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) Each county board shall develop and publish on its website a list
of all special education service delivery models [in]:
(I) IN the local school system; AND
(II) PROVIDED TO PARENTALLY–PLACED PRIVATE SCHOOL
STUDENTS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
– 1 –

Ch. 543 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The county board shall clearly state that all decisions regarding the
placement of a child with a disability in a special education service delivery model under
paragraph [(1)] (1)(I) of this subsection will be made by an individualized education
program team in consultation with the parents or guardians of the child and consistent
with the least restrictive environment requirements of the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act.
[(b)] (C) On request, the county board shall provide a written copy of the
information provided under subsection [(a)] (B) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –